Utah statutes.
20A-11-1303 (Superseded 01/01/11).   School board office candidate --
Financial reporting requirements -- Interim reports.
(1)  Each school board office candidate shall file an interim report at the
following times in any year in which the candidate has filed a declaration of
candidacy for a public office:
(a)  May 15, for state school board office candidates;
(b)  seven days before the regular primary election date;
(c)  August 31; and
(d)  seven days before the regular general election date.
(2)  Each interim report shall include the following information:
(a)  the net balance of the last summary report, if any;
(b)  a single figure equal to the total amount of receipts reported on all
prior interim reports, if any, during the calendar year in which the interim
report is due;
(c)  a single figure equal to the total amount of expenditures reported on all
prior interim reports, if any, filed during the calendar year in which the
interim report is due;
(d)  a detailed listing of each contribution and public service assistance
received since the last summary report that has not been reported in detail on
a prior interim report;
(e)  for each nonmonetary contribution:
(i)  the fair market value of the contribution with that information provided
by the contributor; and
(ii)  a specific description of the contribution;
(f)  a detailed listing of each expenditure made since the last summary report
that has not been reported in detail on a prior interim report;
(g)  for each nonmonetary expenditure, the fair market value of the
expenditure;
(h)  a net balance for the year consisting of the net balance from the last
summary report, if any, plus all receipts since the last summary report minus
all expenditures since the last summary report; and
(i)  a summary page in the form required by the lieutenant governor that
identifies:
(i)  beginning balance;
(ii)  total contributions during the period since the last statement;
(iii)  total contributions to date;
(iv)  total expenditures during the period since the last statement; and
(v)  total expenditures to date.
(3) (a)  For all individual contributions or public service assistance of $50
or less, a single aggregate figure may be reported without separate detailed
listings.
(b)  Two or more contributions from the same source that have an aggregate
total of more than $50 may not be reported in the aggregate, but shall be
reported separately.
(4) (a)  In preparing each interim report, all receipts and expenditures shall
be reported as of five days before the required filing date of the report.
(b)  Any negotiable instrument or check received by a school board office
candidate more than five days before the required filing date of a report
required by this section shall be negotiated and included in the interim
report.
